Tennessee, session 114, HB2276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1012(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(g) The department of education shall submit an annual report to the education
committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having
jurisdiction over academic acceleration, on the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2276
012671
- 1 -